dictionaries/cs/index.dic
Libštejn/LR
Tištín/LR
acidobazický/YR
aglutinovaný/YKRN
akustický/YCRN
amalgámový/YKR
anhaltský/YR
antimikrobiální/YKR
apodiktický/YRN
arový/YKR
atlantický/YRN
avantgardní/YKRN
balvanitý/YRN
bavlnový/YR
bezbariérový/YKR
bezkoncepčnější/YRE
bezprincipiální/YKR
bezúrodný/YKR
biomytologický/YRN
bleskový/YRN
bohdašický/YR
borreliosní/YKRN
branický/YR
brumovský/YR
bulíkovaný/YKRN
bázový/YRN
březový/YRN
celosměnový/YKR
chameleonský/YR
chlípnější/YRW
chrastěšovský/YR
chvastounský/YR
citoslovný/YKR
cvrnkaný/YKRN
daremný/YKR
degradovaný/YKRN
demontovanější/YRW
desetisemestrový/YKR
devítiboký/YR
dialogičtější/YRW
diskutabilní/YKRN
dlouhoňovický/YR
dobubnovaný/YKRN
dodržený/YKRN
doisolovaný/YRN
dokrkaný/YKRN
dolíčkovaný/YKRN
donesený/YKRN
dopočítávaný/YKRN
dosbíraný/YKRN
dostříkávaný/YKRN
dotřímaný/YKRN
dozorovávaný/YKRN
dožitý/YKRN
drsný/YKRN
dumavý/YKRN
dvacetimilimetrový/YR
dvojramenný/YKR
dvoulůžkový/YR
dvoučočkový/YKR
dějepis/HR
důvodnější/YRW
električtější/YRW
endoskopický/YRN
estetizovaný/YKRN
exhibovaný/YKRN
extrusivní/YKRN
federální/YKRN
fixační/YRN
fotbalističtější/YRW
frýdlantský/YR
genderový/YR
golfový/YRN
gynekologický/YRN
harvardský/YKRN
herkulový/YRN
hlaďoučký/YKR
hnojický/YR
holičštější/YRW
horoměřický/YR
hořkosladší/YRE
hromniční/YKRN
humorističtější/YRW
hygienický/YRN
hřebečský/YR
impedanční/YKRN
ineditní/YKRN
instruktážní/YKRN
intrikovaný/YKRN
izraelštější/YRW
jedenapůlkilometrový/YKR
jednolanový/YR
jednočočkový/YKR
ješitný/YKRN
jodovodíkový/YR
kajutový/YR
kanovnický/YR
karlovický/YR
kavernikolní/YKRN
kladívkový/YR
kličínský/YR
knovízský/YR
kolacionovaný/YKRN
komentářový/YRN
koncentrovanější/YRW
konkurzní/YRN
konvertibilnější/YRW
korkový/YKRN
kosířský/YR
kořistný/YKRN
krašlovický/YR
krupicový/YR
ktovský/YR
kuriální/YRN
kvilajový/YKRN
kýlnatý/YKRN
křižínkovský/YR
laminátový/YRN
legatový/YR
letošovský/YR
libědický/YR
lipoidní/YR
lokativní/YKRN
lubský/YR
lámanější/YRW
magický/YCRN
malodohodový/YKRN
mapovitý/YKRN
matracovitý/YR
megatunový/YKRN
meziblokový/YR
mikroekonomický/YCR
mimofakultní/YKR
mizivější/YRW
mnohasettunový/YR
modifikovatelný/YKRN
monominerální/YKR
mozaikovitý/YKRN
mršťovaný/YKRN
mušketový/YKRN
míjivý/YKRN
měďný/YR
nachylovaný/YKRN
nadouvaný/YKRN
nadřazený/YKRN
naivistický/YR
nakvasovický/YR
namontovávaný/YKRN
napodobitelný/YKRN
narudlý/YKRN
nastydnutý/YKRN
naukový/YKR
nazíraný/YKRN
nažehlený/YKRN
nemněnický/YR
nespický/YR
nihilistický/YRN
nostrifikovaný/YKRN
nuznější/YRW
náramný/YKR
nízkosirný/YKR
obchodní/YRN
objektivistický/YR
oblíznutý/YKRN
obrusivý/YKRN
obvazovaný/YKRN
ocelářský/YRN
odběhovější/YRE
odestetizovaný/YKRN
odklad/HR
odlidštěný/YKRN
odolatelný/YKRN
odpravitelný/YKRN
odsolovaný/YKRN
odtlumenější/YRW
odvážlivý/YKRN
odůvodněný/YKRN
ohybový/YKRN
okrájený/YKRN
ometený/YKRN
opatlanější/YRW
oportunističtější/YRW
opřipomínkovaný/YKRN
osedlávaný/YKRN
osmimetrový/YKR
ostnoploutvý/YKR
otcovský/YRN
otřesenější/YRW
oznobený/YKRN
ošuntělý/YKRN
paleozoologický/YRN
paradigmatický/YCRN
paskřivý/YKRN
patřičný/YKRN
perfidní/YKR
petrželový/YR
pivní/YRN
plenivý/YR
plsťovitý/YKR
pobraný/YKRN
podchytitelný/YKRN
podkrovní/YRN
podplutý/YKRN
podvedený/YKRN
pohlavnější/YRW
pojištěný/YKRN
pokuřovaný/YKRN
polokočovný/YKR
polychromovaný/YR
pomluvený/YKRN
popelnatý/YKRN
poradní/YRN
poskytnutější/YRW
postskriptový/YR
potní/YRN
použivatelský/YR
povětrnostní/YRN
početný/YKRN
požraný/YKRN
pravíkovský/YR
prezentovatelnější/YRW
prociťovaný/YKRN
programovaný/YKRN
prokapanější/YRW
proletářštější/YRW
proměňovaný/YKRN
propranější/YRW
proslýchávaný/YKRN
protekcionistický/YCRN
protinádorový/YKR
protkaný/YKRN
provléknutý/YKRN
proškrábanější/YRW
prázdněný/YKRN
pseudostylový/YR
purkarecký/YR
pátravější/YRW
pětatřicetikilometrový/YR
pětičetný/YKR
předbřeznový/YKR
předkroucený/YKRN
předpřipravitelný/YKRN
předváděný/YKRN
přehlídkový/YR
překodrcaný/YKRN
přelepený/YKRN
přenosný/YKRN
přeptávaný/YKRN
přeslechnutý/YKRN
přetažený/YKRN
převodový/YRN
přeřazovanější/YRW
přidrátovaný/YKRN
přikrucovaný/YKRN
připažený/YKRN
přisolený/YKRN
přivazovaný/YKRN
přišívanější/YRW
přísečnický/YR
půlrok/HR
radvánovský/YR
rašovský/YR
regenerovatelný/YKRN
reliktní/YRN
retoretný/YRN
rodilý/YRN
rouno/MQR
rozběřický/YR
rozehnanější/YRW
rozhněvanější/YRW
rozkmitanější/YRW
rozležený/YKRN
rozmísťovanější/YRW
rozpojitelný/YKRN
rozrývaný/YKRN
roztopitelnější/YRW
rozvracený/YKRN
rozšiřovatelnější/YRW
rudozelený/YKR
rytmičtější/YRW
sakrálnější/YRW
saunový/YR
sdruženější/YRW
sebezáchovnější/YR
sedmisethlavý/YR
semanínský/YR
serializovatelný/YKRN
severoamerický/YRN
sešrotovávaný/YKRN
simulovávaný/YKRN
sklepanější/YRW
skrýchovský/YR
slatinický/YR
slovečský/YR
smetanový/YRN
smědčický/YR
sobětický/YR
soudnický/YRN
spalný/YKRN
spláchnutelný/YKRN
spočetný/YKRN
srdíčkový/YR
staroněmecký/YR
stenický/YCRN
stonavý/YR
strašidlový/YR
strýčický/YR
stínový/YKRN
stříbrošedý/YKR
sufixální/YKRN
suťový/YR
svolnější/YRW
světnovský/YR
sytivý/YKRN
taftový/YR
tektonický/YR
terciérní/YKRN
tikový/YR
toastový/YRN
trampský/YKRN
trhávaný/YKRN
trojvrstvý/YR
tuchořický/YR
tvářený/YKRN
těsnopisný/YR
třiapadesátiminutový/YR
tříhranný/YKR
ubitější/YRW
udupávaný/YKRN
uhřínovský/YR
ukázaný/YKRN
umořenější/YRW
upadlejší/YRW
upřímný/YKRN
usměrněnější/YRW
utkávaný/YKRN
uvolený/YKRN
učesávaný/YKRN
vahový/YR
vačnatý/YKRN
veleznámější/YRW
verbalistický/YRN
vidonínský/YR
vkopírovanější/YRW
vložkový/YR
vodnatější/YRE
voskovější/YRW
vrkavý/YR
vtažitelný/YKRN
vybumbaný/YKRN
vydmutý/YKRN
vyhlazený/YKRN
vyjedenější/YRW
vykoulený/YKRN
vyleptávaný/YKRN
vymrznutý/YKRN
vypiplanější/YRW
vyprsknutý/YKRN
vyseknutý/YKRN
vysprchovaný/YKRN
vysířený/YKRN
vytřený/YKRN
vyvřelý/YKRN
vyčíslovávaný/YKRN
vyťatý/YKRN
vznešenější/YRW
váčkovitý/YKR
vícestranný/YKR
výherní/YKRN
výstupný/YKRN
věrohodný/YKRN
všeplatnější/YRW
zabavitelný/YKRN
zachňapaný/YKRN
zahlasovaný/YKRN
zajedený/YKRN
zakouřenější/YRW
zalidnitelný/YKRN
zamýšlený/YKRN
zapjatější/YRE
zapěněný/YKRN
zasluněnější/YRW
zatahovaný/YKRN
zauvažovatelnější/YRW
zaúkolovaný/YRN
zaštkaný/YKRN
zbrašovský/YR
zdecimovaný/YKRN
zdvižný/YKR
zesvětštělý/YKRN
zhublý/YKRN
zklamaný/YKRN
zkrotlý/YKRN
zlobický/YR
zmoklejší/YRW
znemravnělý/YKRN
znělý/YKRN
zplyňovaný/YKRN
zpěvnější/YRW
zrzavější/YRW
zuhelnatělý/YRKN
zvukový/YKRN
záhřevný/YKRN
zásadový/YKRN
zčernalý/YKRN
úlevný/YKRN
útlý/YKRN
čardášový/YR
černožlutý/YKRN
čipový/YR
čtvrttónový/YR
čtyřproudový/YR
řasnatý/YRN
řádkový/YRN
šedesátinásobný/YKRF
šestisetstránkový/YR
šišlavější/YRW
šmátraný/YKRN
štupovaný/YKRN
švitořivý/YKRN
žebrávaný/YKRN
živcový/YR
žánrovitý/YKRN
